Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1136.
do enact as follows:AB1136,14Section 1. 66.1011 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1136,2,11566.1011 (1) Declaration of policy. The right of all persons to have equal 6opportunities for housing regardless of their sex, race, color, disability, as defined in 1s. 106.50 (1m) (g), sexual orientation, as defined in s. 111.32 (13m), religion, 2national origin, marital status, family status, as defined in s. 106.50 (1m) (k), status 3as a victim of domestic abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, as defined in s. 106.50 4(1m) (u), lawful source of income, receipt of rental or housing assistance, age, or 5ancestry is a matter both of statewide concern under ss. 101.132 and 106.50 and 6also of local interest under this section and s. 66.0125. The enactment of ss. 7101.132 and 106.50 by the legislature does not preempt the subject matter of equal 8opportunities in housing from consideration by political subdivisions, and does not 9exempt political subdivisions from their duty, nor deprive them of their right, to 10enact ordinances that prohibit discrimination in any type of housing solely on the 11basis of an individual being a member of a protected class.AB1136,212Section 2. 106.50 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1136,3,413106.50 (1) Intent. It is the intent of this section to render unlawful 14discrimination in housing. It is the declared policy of this state that all persons 15shall have an equal opportunity for housing regardless of sex, race, color, sexual 16orientation, disability, religion, national origin, marital status, family status, status 17as a victim of domestic abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, lawful source of income, 18receipt of rental or housing assistance, age, or ancestry and it is the duty of the 19political subdivisions to assist in the orderly prevention or removal of all 20discrimination in housing through the powers granted under ss. 66.0125 and 2166.1011. The legislature hereby extends the state law governing equal housing 22opportunities to cover single-family residences that are owner-occupied. The 23legislature finds that the sale and rental of single-family residences constitute a 1significant portion of the housing business in this state and should be regulated. 2This section shall be considered an exercise of the police powers of the state for the 3protection of the welfare, health, peace, dignity, and human rights of the people of 4this state.AB1136,35Section 3. 106.50 (1m) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1136,3,116106.50 (1m) (h) “Discriminate” means to segregate, separate, exclude, or treat 7a person or class of persons unequally in a manner described in sub. (2), (2m), or 8(2r) because of sex, race, color, sexual orientation, disability, religion, national 9origin, marital status, family status, status as a victim of domestic abuse, sexual 10assault, or stalking, lawful source of income, receipt of rental or housing assistance, 11age, or ancestry.AB1136,412Section 4. 106.50 (1m) (rm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1136,3,2013106.50 (1m) (rm) “Rental or housing assistance” means any form of financial 14contribution from a 3rd party for the purpose of creating or maintaining affordable 15housing for tenants in buildings other than those owned by small landlords, for 16purchasers, or other recipients of housing, including assistance provided under 42 17USC 1437f, the HOME Investment Partnerships Program administered by the 18federal Department of Housing and Urban Development, or the Community 19Development Block Grant program administered by the federal Department of 20Housing and Urban Development.AB1136,521Section 5. 106.50 (1m) (tm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1136,4,21106.50 (1m) (tm) “Small landlord” means an owner of 4 or fewer dwelling 2units that are offered for rent.AB1136,4,33